Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-424
Court-martial; reports; interpreters; detail.

Under such regulations as the Governor may prescribe, the convening authority of a court-martial, military commission, or court of inquiry shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court or commission. Under like regulations the convening authority of a court-martial, military commission, or court of inquiry may detail or employ interpreters who shall interpret for the court or commission. Any person appointed to interpret for deaf and hard of hearing persons shall be a licensed interpreter as defined in section 20-151.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 24, p. 1565;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 13.